en: Trash Cans & Wastebaskets
xx: Trash Cans & Wastebaskets
cs: Popelnice a odpadkové koše
da: Skraldespande og papirkurve
de: Mülltonnen & Abfalleimer
es: Cubos de la basura y papeleras
fr: Poubelles et corbeilles à déchets, Poubelle
it: Cestini rifiuti/portaimmondizia
ja: ゴミ箱
nl: Prullenbakken en -manden
no: Søppelkasser og papirkurver
pl: Kosze na śmieci
pt: Latas de lixo e cestos de lixo
ru: Мусорные корзины и урны
sv: Soptunnor och papperskorgar
tr: Çöp Kutu ve Sepetleri

en: Waste Containment Accessories
xx: Waste Containment Accessories
cs: Odpadní nádoby – příslušenství
da: Skraldopbevaring – tilbehør
de: Abfallbehälterzubehör
es: Accesorios para contenedores de residuos
fr: Accessoires pour conteneurs à déchets
it: Accessori per contenimento rifiuti
ja: ゴミ箱関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor afvalbakken
no: Tilbehør til avfallsbehandling
pl: Akcesoria do przechowywania śmieci
pt: Acessórios para lixeira
ru: Принадлежности для утилизации отходов
sv: Tillbehör till avfallshantering
tr: Çöp Muhafazası Aksesuarları

en: Waste Container Carts
xx: Waste Container Carts
cs: Vozíky na odpadní kontejnery
da: Skraldecontainer – vogne
de: Abfallbehälterwagen
es: Carritos para contenedores de residuos
fr: Conteneurs à déchets à roulettes
it: Carrelli per contenitori rifiuti
ja: ゴミ箱用カート
nl: Wagentjes voor vuilnisbakken
no: Søppelkassevogner
pl: Pojemniki na śmieci na kółkach
pt: Carrinhos para lixeira
ru: Тележки для мусорных контейнеров
sv: Vagnar till sopkärl
tr: Tekerlekli Çöp Konteynerleri

en: Waste Container Enclosures
xx: Waste Container Enclosures
cs: Ohrádky na odpadní kontejnery
da: Skraldespand – hylstre
de: Abfallbehälter-Verkleidungen
es: Soportes para contenedores de residuos
fr: Cache-conteneurs à déchets
it: Strutture per contenitori rifiuti
ja: ゴミ箱ストッカー
nl: Containerkasten
no: Søppelskur
pl: Stelaże do pojemników na śmieci
pt: Armações para lixeira
ru: Ящики и шкафы для мусорных контейнеров
sv: Ställningar till sopkärl
tr: Çöp Konteyneri Muhafazaları

en: Waste Container Labels & Signs
xx: Waste Container Labels & Signs
cs: Nálepky a značky na odpadní nádoby
da: Mærkater og skilte til affaldsbeholdere
de: Beschriftungen & Etiketten für Abfallbehälter
es: Señales y etiquetas para contenedores de residuos
fr: Étiquettes et vignettes pour conteneurs à déchets
it: Etichette e contrassegni per contenitori rifiuti
ja: ゴミ箱用ラベル・サイン
nl: Stickers en labels voor afvalbakken
no: Etiketter og skilt til avfallsbeholdere
pl: Znaki i etykiety na pojemniki na śmieci
pt: Rótulos e sinais para contêineres de lixo
ru: Ярлыки и знаки для мусорных контейнеров
sv: Etiketter och skyltar till sopkärl
tr: Çöp Kutusu Etiketleri ve İşaretleri

en: Waste Container Lids
xx: Waste Container Lids
cs: Víka na odpadní nádoby
da: Skraldecontainer – låg
de: Abfallbehälterdeckel
es: Tapaderas para contenedores de residuos
fr: Couvercles de conteneurs à déchets
it: Coperchi per contenitori rifiuti
ja: ゴミ箱用フタ
nl: Deksels van vuilnisbakken
no: Søppelkasselokk
pl: Pokrywki do pojemników na śmieci
pt: Tampas para lixeira
ru: Крышки для мусорных контейнеров
sv: Lock till sopkärl
tr: Çöp Konteyneri Kapakları

en: Waste Container Wheels
xx: Waste Container Wheels
cs: Kolečka na odpadní kontejnery
da: Skraldecontainer – hjul
de: Abfallbehälterrollen
es: Ruedas para contenedores de residuos
fr: Roulettes pour conteneurs à déchets
it: Ruote per contenitori rifiuti
ja: ゴミ箱用キャスター
nl: Wielen voor vuilnisbakken
no: Søppelkassehjul
pl: Kółka do pojemników na śmieci
pt: Rodinhas para lixeira
ru: Колёса для мусорных контейнеров
sv: Hjul till sopkärl
tr: Hareketli Çöp Konteynerleri

en: Kitchen & Dining
xx: Kitchen & Dining
cs: Kuchyně a jídelny
da: Køkken og spisestue
de: Küche & Esszimmer
es: Cocina y comedor
fr: Arts de la table et arts culinaires
it: Cucina e pranzo
ja: キッチン・ダイニング
nl: Keuken en eetkamer
no: Kjøkken og spisestue
pl: Kuchnia i jadalnia
pt: Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar
ru: Товары для кухни и столовой
sv: Kök och matsal
tr: Mutfak ve Yemek

en: Barware
xx: Barware
cs: Barové nádobí
da: Barudstyr
de: Bar-Utensilien
es: Utensilios para bares
fr: Accessoires de bar
it: Materiale da bar
ja: バー用品
nl: Baraccessoires
no: Barartikler
pl: Naczynia barowe
pt: Utensílios para bares
ru: Барная посуда
sv: Bartillbehör
tr: İçki Takımları

en: Absinthe Fountains
xx: Absinthe Fountains
cs: Fontánky na absint
da: Absintfontæner
de: Absinth-Fontänen
es: Fuentes de absenta
fr: Fontaines à absinthe
it: Fontane per assenzio
ja: アブサンファウンテン
nl: Absintfonteinen
no: Absintfontener
pl: Fontanny do absyntu
pt: Fontes de absinto
ru: Абсентовые фонтаны
sv: Absintfontäner
tr: Absent Semaverleri

en: Beer Dispensers & Taps
xx: Beer Dispensers & Taps
cs: Výčepní zařízení
da: Ølhaner
de: Bierzapfhähne
es: Grifos y dispensadores de cerveza
fr: Tireuses à bière
it: Spine e dispenser per birra
ja: ビアサーバー
nl: Bierdispensers en -tappen
no: Øltappere og -kraner
pl: Nalewaki do piwa
pt: Torneiras de chope
ru: Пивные краны и диспенсеры
sv: Ölkranar
tr: Bira Sebilleri ve Muslukları

en: Beverage Chilling Cubes & Sticks
xx: Beverage Chilling Cubes & Sticks
cs: Chladicí kostky a tyče do nápojů
da: Whiskey-sten
de: Kühlsteine & -Sticks für Getränke
es: Cubos de piedra para whisky y palos enfriadores de vino
fr: Glaçons réutilisables et bâtons réfrigérants pour boissons
it: Cubetti di ghiaccio per whisky
ja: ウィスキーストーン
nl: Whiskystenen
no: Kjølesteiner og -pinner til drikke
pl: Kamienie do whisky
pt: Pedras para gelar uísque
ru: Камни для виски
sv: Whiskystenar
tr: İçecek Soğutma Küpleri ve Çubukları

en: Beverage Tubs & Chillers
xx: Beverage Tubs & Chillers
cs: Chladicí nádoby na nápoje
da: Spande og køleskabe til afkøling af drikkevarer
de: Getränkewannen & -kühler
es: Refrigeradores de bebidas
fr: Seaux et rafraîchisseurs pour boissons
it: Portabottiglie e secchielli per il ghiaccio
ja: 飲料水用クーラーボックス
nl: Drankenkoelers
no: Drikkekar og -avkjølere
pl: Pojemniki do schładzania napojów
pt: Tubos e resfriadores de bebidas
ru: Ведерки для охлаждения напитков
sv: Ishink och kylare
tr: İçecek Kovaları ve Soğutucuları

en: Bottle Caps
xx: Bottle Caps
cs: Víčka na láhve
da: Flaskekapsler
de: Flaschenverschlüsse
es: Tapones
fr: Capsules
it: Cappucci per bottiglie
ja: ボトル キャップ
nl: Flessendoppen
no: Flaskekorker
pl: Nakrętki i kapsle na butelki
pt: Tampas
ru: Крышки для бутылок
sv: Flaskkapsyler
tr: Şişe Kapakları

en: Bottle Stoppers & Savers
xx: Bottle Stoppers & Savers
cs: Zátky a uzávěry lahví
da: Flaskepropper
de: Flaschenstöpsel & -verschlüsse
es: Tapones para botellas
fr: Bouchons stoppeurs et bouchons à vin, Bouchon en liège, Bouchons en liège
it: Tappi per bottiglie
ja: ワインキャップ・ワインセーバー
nl: Kurken
no: Flaskelukkere
pl: Zatyczki do butelek
pt: Rolhas e protetores de garrafas
ru: Пробки и затычки для бутылок
sv: Flaskstopp och flaskförslutare
tr: Şişe Mantar ve Kapakları

en: Coaster Holders
xx: Coaster Holders
cs: Stojánky na podložky pod hrnky
da: Holdere til bordskånere
de: Untersetzerhalter
es: Soportes para posavasos
fr: Supports pour dessous de verres
it: Contenitori per sottobicchieri
ja: コースターホルダー
nl: Houders voor onderzetters
no: Glassbrikkeholdere
pl: Stojaki na podkładki
pt: Aparadores de porta-copo
ru: Держатели бирдекелей
sv: Underläggshållare
tr: Altlıklar

en: Coasters
xx: Coasters
cs: Pivní tácky
da: Glasbrikker
de: Glasuntersetzer & Bierdeckel
es: Posavasos
fr: Dessous de verres
it: Sottobicchieri
ja: コースター
nl: Onderzetters
no: Ølbrikker
pl: Podkładki pod piwo
pt: Porta-copos
ru: Бирдекели
sv: Glasunderlägg
tr: Bardak Altlıkları

en: Cocktail & Barware Tool Sets
xx: Cocktail & Barware Tool Sets
cs: Sady vybavení na přípravu nápojů
da: Drinkredskaber – sæt
de: Cocktail- & Barzubehörsets
es: Juegos de utensilios para bebidas
fr: Kits d'accessoires pour boissons et cocktails
it: Set di strumenti per cocktail e bevande
ja: バーツールセット
nl: Barsetjes
no: Utstyrssett for drinklaging
pl: Zestawy przyborów do drinków
pt: Conjuntos de utensílios para drinques
ru: Наборы инструментов для напитков
sv: Verktygsset för drinkar
tr: İçki Alet Setleri

en: Cocktail Shakers & Tools
xx: Cocktail Shakers & Tools
cs: Šejkry a krustovače
da: Cocktailshakere og -redskaber
de: Cocktailshaker & Zubehör
es: Cocteleras y accesorios
fr: Shakers et accessoires
it: Shaker e strumenti da cocktail
ja: カクテル用品
nl: Cocktailshakers en -benodigdheden
no: Shakere og utstyr til drinkmiksing
pl: Shakery i przybory do drinków
pt: Misturadores e utensílios para drinques
ru: Шейкеры и инструменты для барменов
sv: Drinkshakers och drinkverktyg
tr: Kokteyl Çalkalayıcıları ve Aletleri

en: Bar Ice Picks
xx: Bar Ice Picks
cs: Barové vidličky na led
da: Issyle
de: Bar-Eispickel
es: Picadoras de hielo
fr: Pics à glace
it: Punteruoli da ghiaccio
ja: アイスピック
nl: IJspriemen
no: Ishakker
pl: Szpikulce do lodu
pt: Picadores de gelo
ru: Пестики для колки льда
sv: Ishackor för barer
tr: Buz Maşaları